Missouri, session 2026, SB1626.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 393.402, to read as
follows:
393.402. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service
commission;
(2) "Public utility", the same as defined in section
386.020.
2. Whenever a complaint has been made by a rate payer
to the commission concerning any rate, fare, toll, rental,
or charge for any product or commodity furnished or service
performed by a public utility, and the commission has found,
after conducting an investigation, that the public utility
has charged an excessive or discriminatory amount for such
product, commodity, or service, the commission may order
that the public utility make due reparation to the
complainant therefor, with interest from the date of
collection determined by the commission, provided no
discrimination will result from such reparation. The

SB 1626 2
commission shall also have the authority to impose penalties
or fines on the public utility for such excessive or
discriminatory charges pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter and chapter 386. In case of a continuing violation
by a public utility under this subsection, for each day a
violation occurred shall be considered a separate and
distinct offence pursuant to the provisions of section
386.570.
3. If the public utility does not comply with the
order from the commission under subsection 2 of this section
within the specified time frame as provided in such order,
the commission may commence a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction for the enforcement of such order.
If the court finds that a violation occurred, the court
shall enter an order so declaring and the court shall order
that the public utility comply with the commission order
under subsection 2 of this section. The court may also
grant injunctive relief, attorney fees, and any such other
relief the court finds appropriate.
4. Any rate payer aggrieved by excessive or
discriminatory charges by a public utility under this
section may submit a complaint to the commission within two
years from the date such excessive or discriminatory charges
occurred. The commission may commence a civil action under
subsection 3 of this section within one year from the date
the commission issued an order under subsection 2 of this
section.
✓